Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 5. Public Gathering Places.

§ 32.1-198.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Public gathering places” includes, but is not limited to:

Historic shrines;

Terminals of public transportation companies;

Festivals, fairs, races and other places where 100 or more people congregate at one time.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-63; 1979, c. 711; 1988, c. 60.

§ 32.1-199.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 60.

§ 32.1-200.
Regulations.

The Board may adopt such regulations governing toilet facilities, sewage disposal facilities and water supply facilities at public gathering places as may be necessary to protect the public health. Such regulations may include without limitation (i) a requirement that there be toilet facilities, sewage disposal facilities and water supply facilities and standards therefor; (ii) requirements that toilet facilities and all fixtures therein be kept clean and in a good state of repair; and (iii) a system of classifying public gathering places with different regulations for each such classification.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-63; 1979, c. 711; 1988, c. 60.

§ 32.1-201.
Free access to certain toilet facilities.

Public gathering places required by Board regulation to provide toilet facilities shall provide without charge at least one toilet for each sex.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-63.2; 1977, c. 410; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-202.
Power of counties, cities and towns not limited.

Nothing contained in this article shall in any way limit the power of any county, city or town to regulate by ordinance sanitary conditions in service stations and public gathering places located therein, but no such ordinance may impose requirements less stringent than the regulations of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-63; 1979, c. 711.